Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 13. Hathaway Scholarship Program
§ 21-16-1308.
Administration; rules and regulations.

This article shall be administered by the department in accordance with the following:

Students shall make application for scholarships under this article with the eligible institution at the time of applying for admission or in any event prior to the beginning of the semester at the eligible institution. The application shall contain information as required by rule of the department. The application shall require each applicant to verify under penalty of false swearing under W.S.

6-5-303

, that the applicant has not been convicted of a felony in this state or another jurisdiction;

Upon request of a student applying to an eligible institution and initially applying for a Hathaway scholarship, each school district shall provide to the eligible institution an official transcript of the student’s academic record through the student’s most recent semester of attendance. Following graduation and upon the student’s request the school district shall also provide to the eligible institution an official transcript of the student’s complete academic record. All transcripts provided pursuant to this paragraph shall designate each course which satisfies the success curriculum requirements established under W.S.

21-16-1307

;

For students transferring from an eligible institution to another eligible institution and making application for continuance of a scholarship, the institution from which the student is transferring shall at the student’s request provide an official transcript to the new institution and shall provide a list of all semesters of attendance in which a Hathaway scholarship was received by the student and, if applicable, a list of all semesters for which a student previously qualifying for a Hathaway scholarship was determined ineligible for the Hathaway scholarship;

Each eligible institution receiving an application from a student applying for a Hathaway scholarship shall preliminarily determine the student’s eligibility for the scholarship. For students initially applying for a scholarship, unless the student’s complete academic record is available, the GPA used to preliminarily determine eligibility shall be based upon the student’s official high school transcript after either the end of the first semester of a student’s senior year or the second semester of a student’s junior year, at the sole discretion of the eligible institution. For students graduating prior to their senior year the GPA used to preliminarily determine eligibility shall be based upon the student’s official high school transcript as of the end of the semester immediately prior to the last semester before the student’s graduation. High school GPAs for final eligibility determinations for students initially applying for a scholarship under this article shall be based upon the student’s complete high school academic record. Upon final determination of scholarship eligibility, each community college shall certify to the community college commission not later than thirty (30) days after the semester commences, a list of students enrolled at the institution who qualify for a scholarship under this article, including the amount of each scholarship. The university shall certify to the department within forty-five (45) days after the semester commences a like list for students enrolled at the university. The director of the community college commission shall verify within ten (10) days after receiving all lists from community colleges whether there is any duplication of students on the community college lists, shall provide the lists to the department and shall certify to the department the amount each college is to receive under this article. Students attending more than one (1) eligible institution shall enter into a consortium agreement with the multiple institutions whereby the student shall designate a home institution to be paid the entire Hathaway scholarship amount for which the student qualifies;

The department shall determine and certify to the state treasurer the amount which is equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of the total amount the eligible institution received during the preceding semester under this subsection. Not later than September 1 for the fall semester and not later than January 15 for the spring semester, the state treasurer shall pay from the scholarship expenditure account the amount certified by the department. The department shall review the lists provided under paragraph (iv) of this subsection, determine whether there is any duplication of students, and determine and certify to the state treasurer the balance of the amount due under this article to each institution for the semester. For any duplication, the department shall determine whether the student is attending more than one (1) eligible institution. If the student is attending multiple eligible institutions payment of the Hathaway scholarship for which the student qualifies shall be made only to the institution designated as the home institution by the student. The state treasurer shall pay from the scholarship expenditure account the balance of the amount due. Payments of the balance due under this paragraph shall be made not later than seventy-five (75) days after the institution’s semester has commenced. Payments to the university shall be made directly to the university. Payments to the community colleges shall be made directly to each college and be reported by the state treasurer to the community college commission. Should a prepayment under this paragraph exceed the amount actually due the institution for any semester, the excess amount shall be calculated by the department and deducted from the next payment made. For purposes of this subsection, payments due for summer terms shall be included within the calculations and payments for the subsequent fall semester.

The department shall, in consultation with University of Wyoming and community college admissions officers, the Wyoming community college commission and financial aid officers and school districts, promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this article, including:

A means for informing all students and their parents or guardians of the availability of the scholarships under this article in sufficient time to enable the student to plan for and complete the success curriculum. The means shall at a minimum include:

A requirement that each written communication from a school district to a parent or guardian of a student include on any envelope used, or on the communication if no separate envelope is used, a statement that the state of Wyoming provides Hathaway merit and need scholarships to Wyoming students attending the University of Wyoming and Wyoming community colleges and that every Wyoming student who meets the merit requirements can earn a Hathaway merit scholarship;

A summary of available Hathaway scholarships and requirements to earn a scholarship. The summary shall be made available on the department’s website on the Internet, the World Wide Web or similar proprietary or common carrier electronic system;

Provision for each school district to provide a one (1) week unit of instruction in the eighth grade regarding preparation for post-secondary work, including an overview of a curriculum needed to be successful in post-secondary education, standardized test requirements, scholarships available for post-secondary education and earning differences anticipated at various post-secondary education levels. The unit of instruction provided under this subparagraph shall be developed by the department in consultation with school districts and shall be delivered to school districts. The department in consultation with the school districts shall develop a program of a curriculum needed to be successful in post-secondary education, standardized test requirements, scholarships available for post-secondary education and earning differences anticipated at various post-secondary education levels;

In addition to the unit of instruction required under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph, and commencing school year 2007-2008 and each school year thereafter, provision of counseling services to students enrolled in grades eight (8) through twelve (12) in accordance with the following:

Counseling shall be provided to each student beginning in grade eight (8) on components of the unit of instruction required under subparagraph (C) of this paragraph including curriculum requirements of high school graduation, curriculum requirements necessary for each of the Hathaway scholarships, current achievement levels for the statewide proficiency assessment, the importance of curriculum for career options and the earning differences anticipated based upon curriculum choices and at various levels of post secondary education;

Counseling for each successive year following initial counseling in grade eight (8) shall include an assessment of the student’s course history and options available as to future course selection and consequences attached to selected course pathways;

Counseling services shall be provided by counselors or designated employees of the district;

Counseling in grades eight (8) and nine (9) shall include a summary of the various Hathaway scholarships and other information regarding scholarship opportunities available to students and associated curriculum and student performance requirements.

Applications, forms, financial and program audit procedures, eligibility and other matters related to efficient operation;

Criteria and procedures under which students in a home-based educational program can qualify for scholarships under this article. A student in a home-based educational program:

Shall make application for an initial scholarship before his twenty-first birthday;

Shall meet the initial eligibility requirements of this article other than attendance and graduation from an eligible high school and corresponding GPA requirements, but shall comply with curriculum requirements specified under W.S.

21-16-1307

, as applicable;

Who is otherwise eligible and who achieves the requisite minimum national percentile rank score or requisite cumulative career-technical aptitude assessment score shall be eligible for the scholarships provided under this article at the same level and to the same extent as students graduating from eligible high schools.

Criteria and procedures under which students who receive a high school equivalency certificate can qualify for scholarships under this article. A student receiving a high school equivalency certificate shall:

Receive the certificate and make application for the initial scholarship no later than four (4) years after and no sooner than the graduation date of the student’s high school class, unless ordered by a court to complete the requirements for the certificate prior to that graduation date or for other good cause shown as determined by the department. For purposes of making application prior to the graduation date of the student’s class, “other good cause” shall include, but is not limited to, a showing by the student that the student has been emancipated under W.S.

14-1-201

through

14-1-206

or that the student is a parent or a legal guardian of a minor. The student shall have attended an eligible high school prior to receiving his certificate and shall have received his certificate while residing in Wyoming;

Meet the initial eligibility requirements of this article other than curriculum requirements, attendance and graduation from an eligible high school and corresponding GPA requirements;

If otherwise eligible, be eligible for a scholarship at scores under alternative instruments included within the high school equivalency certificate, as set by rule and regulation of the Wyoming community college commission, which are comparable to GPA requirements specified under W.S.

21-16-1304

corresponding to the applicable Hathaway opportunity, performance and honor scholarship or under W.S.

21-16-1305

corresponding to the Hathaway provisional opportunity scholarship.

through (III) Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 25, § 2.

Criteria, which shall include satisfactory completion of all terms and conditions imposed upon the applicant by the court in which the felony conviction was obtained, in order to determine when an exception may be granted to W.S. 21-16-1303(e)(vi) to allow the person to receive a scholarship under this article;

A means for informing all Hathaway scholarship recipients, at the time they are notified of the scholarship award, of the origin of the Hathaway scholarship program and the individual for whom the program is named including his biographic data and describing in particular his commitment to this state and to the promise of the youth of this state;

Implementing success curriculum requirements as authorized by W.S.

21-16-1307

;

Any other rules and regulations necessary for the implementation and administration of this article.

The department shall establish annual reporting procedures for purposes of policy analysis and program evaluation and providing accurate data to the legislature and governor relative to the program’s impact on the state and on students. In developing the annual reporting procedure the department shall consult with the University of Wyoming and community college financial aid officers and registrars or their designees. It is the intention of the legislature that the reporting system and the requirements thereof shall be applicable to all recipients of scholarships under this article. Compliance with this section shall be made a condition of receiving a scholarship under this article. For any student attending more than one (1) eligible institution, the home institution shall be responsible for data reporting for that student, and any other eligible institution shall cooperate as necessary with the home institution to fulfill that duty. The reporting system shall include the following information:

A report prepared for each semester or equivalent periods of time during each academic year relative to the rate of retention of program participants;

Scholarships by students as they progress from semester to semester or other equivalent periods of time as may be applicable once enrolled at an eligible institution. The data shall be reported by institution attended, by the instructional program, and by scholarship category and shall include the percent of students losing scholarship eligibility due to not earning the minimum number of credit hours, the percent of students losing scholarship eligibility due to not having the required cumulative grade point average, the percent of students losing scholarship eligibility for failing to make satisfactory academic progress and the percentage of students losing scholarship eligibility for failing to enroll. The same information shall also be reported by categories showing those students qualifying through career-technical aptitude assessment scores and scores on high school equivalency certification, and by the group of students who attended a home-based educational program and did not graduate from an eligible high school;

The persistence rates at the eligible institutions of freshmen, sophomore, junior and senior students receiving a scholarship reported by scholarship category and by award year;

The graduation rates or rates of completion of the chosen post-secondary education program if otherwise applicable for students receiving a scholarship reported by scholarship category and award year, including for those graduating with an academic degree at the baccalaureate level the rate for persons graduating within four (4) years, within five (5) years and within six (6) years, respectively and including for those graduating with a certificate or associate degree the rate for persons graduating within one (1), two (2) and three (3) years;

The mean length of time required for a student receiving a scholarship under this article to graduate with a degree or to complete the certificate program with such information being reported by scholarship category and by award year;

An annual report on the number of applicants as well as the percent of high school graduates by high school district who meet the success curriculum requirements, the percent who apply for a scholarship by scholarship category, and the percent of those students who are awarded a scholarship and subsequently enroll in an eligible institution;

and (viii) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 102, § 2.

The annual report by the department shall be submitted to the governor and the legislature in accordance with W.S.

9-2-1014

.

The department may conduct an audit of any eligible institution participating in the scholarship program under this article to determine compliance with any provision of this article.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 1; 2007, ch. 110, § 1; ch. 187, § 1; 2009, ch. 204, § 1; 2013 ch. 25, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2015 ch. 98, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 15, § 1, effective March 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 65, § 1, effective March 12, 2018; 2019 ch. 28, § 1, effective February 15, 2019; 2019 ch. 102, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 110, § 1, in (a)(iv), substituted “whether” for “that” following “lists from community colleges”, substituted “any” for “no” preceding “duplication of students” and added the last sentence; in (a)(v) inserted “whether” following “of this subsection, determine”, substituted “any” for “no” preceding “duplication of students,” and added fourth sentence; in (c) added fifth sentence.

Laws 2007, ch. 110, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 23, 2007.

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 187, § 1, in (a)(ii) added last sentence; added (b)(i)(D); in (b)(iii)(B) inserted “but shall comply with curriculum requirements specified under W.S.

21-16-1307

, as applicable” at the end of the sentence; added (b)(vii) and redesignated existing paragraphs accordingly; inserted “meet the success curriculum requirements, the percent who” in (c)(vi).

Laws 2007, ch. 187, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2007.

While neither act gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in the section as set out above.

The 2009 amendment,

substituted “provisional opportunity scholarship” for “career scholarship” at the end of (b)(iv)(C)(I).

Laws 2009, ch. 204, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2009.

The 2013 amendment,

in (b) added “the Wyoming community college commission”; in (b)(iv) substituted “high school” for “general educational development (GED)”; substituted “certificate” for “diploma”; substituted “high school equivalency certificate” for “GED”; in (b)(iv)(A) substituted “certificate” for “GED” throughout”; in (b)(iv)(C) deleted “as follows”; added “at scores under alternative instruments included within the high school equivalency certificate, as set by rule and regulation of the Wyoming community college commission, which are comparable to GPA requirements specified under W.S. 21 16 1304 corresponding to the applicable Hathaway opportunity, performance and honor scholarship or under W.S. 21 16 1305 corresponding to the Hathaway provisional opportunity scholarship”; in (c) deleted “GED”; and added “on high school equivalency certification”; and repealed (b)(iv)(C)(I) through (III) which read as follows: “(I) With a minimum GED standard score of 500, a scholarship at the same level and to the same extent as a Hathaway opportunity scholarship or provisional opportunity scholarship; (II) With a minimum GED standard score of 540, a scholarship at the same level and to the same extent as a Hathaway performance scholarship; (III) With a minimum GED standard score of 575, a scholarship at the same level and to the same extent as a Hathaway honor scholarship.”

Laws 2013, ch. 25, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 14, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b)(iv)(A), inserted the present second sentence.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in (b)(iii)(C), substituted “minimum
national percentile rank score or requisite” for “composite
ACT or”; in (c)(vii), substituted “score associated
with the 2015-2016 national percentile rankings, on an examination
administered throughout the United States and relied upon by institutions
of higher education to determine acceptance of students for attendance
or score on the” for “score on the ACT or.”

The 2018 amendment,

in (b)(iv)(A), substituted “later than four (4) years after” for “later than two (2) years after” in the first sentence.

Laws 2018, ch. 65, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2018.

The 2019 amendment,

substituted "career-technical aptitude assessment" for "WORKKEYS" in (b)(iii)(C), (c)(ii), (c)(vii).

Laws 2019, ch. 28, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 15, 2019.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 110, § 2, states: “The department of education, in consultation with the University of Wyoming and the community colleges, shall conduct an analysis of the administrative and fiscal feasibility of expanding student scholarships under the Hathaway scholarship program to include private in-state institutions and student scholarship enhancement based upon meritorious academic performance. The department, together with the university and colleges, shall report findings of the analysis and subsequent recommendations to the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint education interim committee on or before November 1, 2007.”

Effective Dates

Laws 2019, ch. 102 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2019.

Appropriations. —

2009, ch. 205, §§ 2-5 provides:

“Sec. 2: (a) One hundred fifty-seven thousand dollars ($157,000.00) is appropriated from the public school foundation program account to the department of education to establish a transcript data center within the department providing a common course coding capability between secondary schools. The transcript center will enable the department to provide required statistical studies and information to the legislature in accordance with W.S. 21-16-1308(c)(vii) and (viii), describing relationships between student high school coursework and subsequent student performance on required college entrance assessments and in enrolled post secondary programs.

“(b) The amount appropriated under subsection (a) of this section shall be for the period beginning on the effective date of this section and ending on June 30, 2010, and shall be expended for necessary data software to enable automation of the course matching process between schools.

“(c) Not later than October 1, 2009, the department shall report to the joint education interim committee on the expenditure of funds appropriated under this section and on the status of the transcript data center.”

“Sec. 3: (a) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00) is appropriated from the public school foundation program account to the department of education for implementation of the one (1) week unit of eighth grade instruction regarding preparation for post secondary work as required under W.S. 21-16-1308(b)(i)(C). The appropriation is for the period commencing on the effective date of this section and ending June 30, 2010, and shall be expended for student career assessments prescribed under W.S. 21-16-1308(b)(i)(C) in developing curriculum necessary for success in post secondary education programs and meeting standardized test requirements for scholarships available for post secondary education.

“(b) The department shall report on the use of funds appropriated under this section to the joint education interim committee by October 1, 2009.”

“Sec. 4: (a) Thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00) is appropriated from the public school foundation program account to the state superintendent for expansion of participation in the WORKKEYS job skills assessment to Wyoming high school seniors interested in attaining certification in career readiness as offered through the department of workforce services. This appropriation is for the period beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2010, and shall apply to test administration in the 2009-2010 school year at a date determined by the school district, and shall apply to high school seniors who have not previously taken the WORKKEYS job skills assessment. This appropriation shall be expended for contractual services necessary to provide for the assessment opportunity required under this section.

“(b) In sufficient time to enable expanded assessment administration pursuant to this section during the 2009-2010 school year, the state superintendent in cooperation with the department of workforce services shall provide notice to school districts of the expanded assessment opportunity provided under this section together with the requirements and availability of career readiness certification upon successful completion of the WORKKEYS assessment.

“(c) On or before October 1, 2010, the state superintendent and the department of workforce services shall report to the joint education interim committee on the expansion of the WORKKEYS assessment administration pursuant to this section, on the attainment of career readiness certification and on recommendations for continuation of expanded assessment opportunities.”

“Sec. 5: All appropriations contained in this act shall be considered one time funding and shall not be contained in any agency's 2011-2012 biennial standard budget request.”

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2013, ch. 25, § 3 provides: “The Wyoming community college commission shall promulgate rules and regulations establishing alternative instruments comprising the state-authorized examination for determining certification of the equivalency of a high school diploma in sufficient time for use in the 2013–2014 academic year.
In addition, commission rules and regulations shall set qualifying scores for the different Hathaway scholarships as required under W.S. 21-16-1308(b)(iv)(C), as amended by section 1 of this act.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2016, ch. 15, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 1, 2016.

§ 21-16-1309.
Scholarship amounts.

To the extent a scholarship under this article would, when combined with any grant or scholarship from a student financial aid program administered through the state or any state institution, in any semester exceed the cost of attendance at the eligible institution, the scholarship under this article shall be reduced by the amount necessary to not exceed that cost of attendance.

To the extent sufficient funds are not available in the expenditure account to fund all scholarships as provided under this article:

Funds available for scholarships under W.S.

21-16-1304

and

21-16-1305

shall be used for scholarships under W.S.

21-16-1306

after all scholarships under W.S.

21-16-1304

and

21-16-1305

have been paid;

Funds available for scholarships under W.S.

21-16-1306

shall be used for scholarships under W.S. 21-16-1304 and 21-16-1305 after all scholarships under W.S. 21-16-1306 have been paid;

After all funds within the expenditure account have been expended, funds within the Hathaway student scholarship reserve account shall be used to fund any remaining scholarships awarded under this article;

If no funds remain available in the expenditure account or reserve account at the time payment is required to be made to an institution for any semester, the payment to the eligible institutions shall be reduced on a first come first served basis using the student’s application date for the scholarship.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 1.

§ 21-16-1310.
Legislative oversight and authority.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to constitute an entitlement to a scholarship established and funded by the legislature. Wyoming Hathaway scholarships shall be subject to legislative appropriation and the legislature reserves the right to modify or terminate the program established under this article at any time.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 1.

§ 21-16-1311.
Hathaway scholarship program reporting.

The University of Wyoming and each community college shall report on the use of all scholarship funds controlled by the institution, exclusive of federal funds. The report shall show the total scholarship funds, including scholarship funds granted via tuition discounts, for the most recently completed biennium contrasted with the biennium ending June 30, 2006. The report shall show how any funds supplanted by Hathaway scholarships have been reallocated for other scholarship and student financial aid programs or have been rebudgeted for other purposes and the plans for such funds for the coming biennium. The report shall describe the extent to which the university and community colleges have included within regular written or electronic communications transmitted to alumni of the institutions, information on the progress of the scholarship programs established under this article and information on making contributions to the Hathaway student scholarship endowment account. The Wyoming community college commission shall specify the format of, and combine and transmit the reports on behalf of each college. The University of Wyoming and the community college commission shall include the reports within the respective biennial budget requests submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

.

History:

2014 ch. 7, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 6, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 21-16-1312.
Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship; eligibility requirements and conditions; selection.

There is created the Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship. The scholarship shall be administered by the department in accordance with this section and rules adopted by the department. Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship recipients shall be selected by a committee comprised of the governor, state superintendent of public instruction, president of the University of Wyoming and executive director of the community college commission, or their designees.

Each year up to two (2) students from each state contiguous to Wyoming may be awarded a Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship, not to exceed an aggregate of twenty-four (24) active awards at any time. Awards of Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarships shall be contingent on available funds and anticipated revenue to the Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship expenditure account. Minimum initial qualifications for a Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship shall be all initial requirements applicable to a Hathaway honor scholarship, other than Wyoming residency and graduation from a high school located in Wyoming. In addition to those requirements, recipients shall have:

A minimum cumulative high school GPA of 3.75 and a score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016 national percentile rank of ninety-seven (97) on an examination administered throughout the United States and relied upon by institutions of higher education to determine acceptance of students for attendance;

At the time of graduation, be a resident of a state contiguous to Wyoming and have successfully completed a curriculum at least as stringent as that imposed under W.S.

21-16-1307

for Hathaway honor scholarships.

A Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship shall be for the student’s cost of attendance at an eligible institution, but not to exceed the maximum dollar amount provided to students receiving a trustee scholarship at the University of Wyoming and subject to reduction in accordance with W.S. 21-16-1309(a). No student shall be eligible for a Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship for more than the equivalent of eight (8) full-time semesters. Minimum continuing eligibility and reinstatement eligibility requirements for a Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship shall be the same as requirements for a Hathaway honors scholarship. These minimum requirements may be increased by rule of the department to requirements no more stringent than those imposed by the University of Wyoming for recipients of a trustee scholarship. Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarships may be reduced in the same manner and to lower levels as provided for Hathaway honor scholarships for failure to meet continuing eligibility requirements.

Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarships shall not be subject to the provisions of W.S.

21-16-1308

, but shall be administered by the department in accordance with the provisions of this section and the following:

The department shall, in consultation with University of Wyoming and community college admissions officers and financial aid officers, promulgate rules necessary to implement this section. The consultation shall include development of a means for informing students in contiguous states of the availability of Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarships;

Eligible institutions shall provide information required by the department as necessary to fulfill its duties under this section;

Students shall apply for Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarships with the department at the time of applying for admission or at an earlier time as established by rule of the department. The application shall contain information required by rule of the department. The application shall require each applicant to verify under penalty of false swearing under W.S.

6-5-303

, that the applicant has not been convicted of a felony in this state or another jurisdiction;

The department shall determine and certify to the state treasurer the amount of scholarships awarded under this section for attendance at each eligible institution not later than September 1 for the fall semester and not later than January 15 for the spring semester. Upon receipt of the certification the state treasurer shall pay from the scholarship expenditure account the amount certified by the department;

The same information required to be reported under W.S.

21-16-1308

for Hathaway opportunity, performance and honor scholarships shall be reported for Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarships awarded.

Before awarding a Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship, the department shall obtain an agreement from each student, or the student’s guardian, under which the student agrees to:

Actively engage in work in Wyoming for one (1) year or attend graduate school at the University of Wyoming for one (1) year, for every four (4) academic semesters or portions thereof in which a Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship was received. The department shall establish by rule the commencement of the period for undertaking the requirements of this paragraph, which period shall begin not later than one (1) year after the completion of the last semester in which a Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship was received; or

Repay all Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship amounts, together with interest which shall begin accruing four (4) years after execution of the agreement. However, interest shall begin to accrue immediately upon the department determining that the student has withdrawn from the Wyoming institution of higher education or is otherwise not making satisfactory academic progress toward completion of a degree or program. Money expended under this section shall accrue at an annual interest rate equal to that charged for federal direct student loans at the time interest begins to accrue, which rate shall be adjusted annually to match the federal direct student loan rate. In no event shall the interest rate be greater than eight percent (8%). Any amounts repaid by Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship recipients shall be deposited to the Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship endowment fund created by W.S. 9-4-204(u)(viii).

The Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship expenditure account is created to consist of earnings from the Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship endowment fund created by W.S. 9-4-204(u)(viii) and such other funds appropriated by the legislature to the expenditure account. No state funds shall be appropriated to the expenditure account or used for scholarships under this section. The monies deposited to the expenditure account under this subsection shall be available for scholarships under this section. Monies within the expenditure account are continuously appropriated to the state treasurer for distribution to eligible institutions based on scholarships awarded under this section. All unexpended and unencumbered monies within the expenditure account at the end of each fiscal year shall be deposited by the state treasurer to the Hathaway expand Wyoming scholarship endowment fund.

History.

2019 ch. 81, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2019, ch. 81 § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.